Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.900.030

Continuation of existing law.

The provisions of this title, Title 28B RCW, insofar as they are substantially the same as statutory provisions repealed by this chapter, and relating to the same subject matter, shall be construed as restatements and continuations, and not as new enactments. Nothing in this 1969 code revision of Title 28 RCW shall be construed as authorizing any new bond issues or new or additional appropriations of moneys but the bond issue authorizations herein contained shall be construed only as continuations of bond issues authorized by prior laws herein repealed and reenacted, and the appropriations of moneys herein contained are continued herein for historical purposes only and this 1969 act shall not be construed as a reappropriation thereof and no appropriation contained herein shall be deemed to be extended or revived hereby and such appropriation shall lapse or shall have lapsed in accordance with the original enactment: PROVIDED, That this 1969 act shall not operate to terminate, extend, or otherwise affect any appropriation for the biennium commencing July 1, 1967 and ending June 30, 1969.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.98.030. Formerly RCW 28B.98.030.]